District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-705.01

Participation in cost of emergency overnight shelter.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-146, § 6a
as added Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-197, § 2(g), 37 DCR 4815
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 504, 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 10, 44 DCR 1271
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 8, 45 DCR 745
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(b), 52 DCR 8113

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-605.1.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 3 of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834) and § 3 of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 504 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Editor's Notes

“Be” was inserted in the third sentence of (a) to correct an error in D.C. Law 8-197.